Utah statutes.
54-13-5.   Establishment of fee.

The commission may, by rule, establish a fee for the inspection of pipeline facilities of any person engaged in intrastate pipeline transportation who does not pay a public utilities regulation fee pursuant to Title 54, Chapter 5.



Enacted by Chapter 131, 1989 General Session

